fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX yW Y 38
SFX yW ire ire/n'q'd'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire iant/n'q'd'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire i/q' rire
SFX yW ire is/j'n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yW ire it/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire ions/n'q'l't' rire
SFX yW ire iez/n'q'l'm' rire
SFX yW ire ient/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire iais/j'n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yW ire iait/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire iions/n'q'l't' rire
SFX yW ire iiez/n'q'l'm' rire
SFX yW ire iaient/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire îmes/n'q'l't' rire
SFX yW ire îtes/n'q'l'm' rire
SFX yW ire irent/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire irai/j'n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yW ire iras/n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yW ire ira/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire irons/n'q'l't' rire
SFX yW ire irez/n'q'l'm' rire
SFX yW ire iront/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire irais/j'n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yW ire irait/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire irions/n'q'l't' rire
SFX yW ire iriez/n'q'l'm' rire
SFX yW ire iraient/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire ie/j'n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire ies/n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yW ire isse/j'n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yW ire isses/n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yW ire ît/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire issions/n'q'l't' rire
SFX yW ire issiez/n'q'l'm' rire
SFX yW ire issent/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yW ire is/n'l'm't' rire
SFX yW ire ions/n'l't' rire
SFX yW ire iez/n'l'm' rire

SFX yX Y 30
SFX yX nuire nuire/n'q'd'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisant/n'q'd'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nui/q' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuit/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisons/n'q'l't' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisez/n'q'l'm' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisent/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisait/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisions/n'q'l't' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisiez/n'q'l'm' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisaient/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisit/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisîmes/n'q'l't' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisîtes/n'q'l'm' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisirent/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuira/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirons/n'q'l't' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirez/n'q'l'm' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiront/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirait/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirions/n'q'l't' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiriez/n'q'l'm' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiraient/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuise/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisît/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissions/n'q'l't' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissiez/n'q'l'm' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissent/n'q'l'm't's' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisons-nous/n'l't' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisez-vous/n'l'm' nuire

SFX yY Y 4
SFX yY ccire ccire/n'q'd'l'm't's' occire
SFX yY ccire ccis/L'D'Q' occire
SFX yY ccire ccise/L'D'Q' occire
SFX yY ccire ccises/D'Q' occire

SFX yZ Y 14
SFX yZ rire rire/n'q'd'l'm't's' rire
SFX yZ rire risant/n'q'd'l'm't's' rire
SFX yZ rire rit/L'D'Q' rire
SFX yZ rire rits/D'Q' rire
SFX yZ rire rite/L'D'Q' rire
SFX yZ rire rites/D'Q' rire
SFX yZ rire ris/j'n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yZ rire rit/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yZ rire rirai/j'n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yZ rire riras/n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yZ rire rira/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yZ rire rirais/j'n'q'l'm't' rire
SFX yZ rire rirait/n'q'l'm't's' rire
SFX yZ rire ris/n'l'm't' rire

SFX q+ Y 36
SFX q+ enir enu/L'D'Q' enir
SFX q+ enir enus/D'Q' enir
SFX q+ enir enue/L'D'Q' enir
SFX q+ enir enues/D'Q' enir
SFX q+ tir ti/L'D'Q' tir
SFX q+ tir tis/D'Q' tir
SFX q+ tir tie/L'D'Q' tir
SFX q+ tir ties/D'Q' tir
SFX q+ courir couru/L'D'Q' courir
SFX q+ courir courus/D'Q' courir
SFX q+ courir courue/L'D'Q' courir
SFX q+ courir courues/D'Q' courir
SFX q+ ivre écu/L'D'Q' vivre
SFX q+ ivre écus/D'Q' vivre
SFX q+ ivre écue/L'D'Q' vivre
SFX q+ ivre écues/D'Q' vivre
SFX q+ aire u/L'D'Q' aire
SFX q+ aire us/D'Q' aire
SFX q+ aire ue/L'D'Q' aire
SFX q+ aire ues/D'Q' aire
SFX q+ dre du/L'D'Q' dre
SFX q+ dre dus/D'Q' dre
SFX q+ dre due/L'D'Q' dre
SFX q+ dre dues/D'Q' dre
SFX q+ valoir valu/L'D'Q' .valoir
SFX q+ valoir valus/D'Q' .valoir
SFX q+ valoir value/L'D'Q' .valoir
SFX q+ valoir values/D'Q' .valoir
SFX q+ aître u/L'D'Q' aître
SFX q+ aître us/D'Q' aître
SFX q+ aître ue/L'D'Q' aître
SFX q+ aître ues/D'Q' aître
SFX q+ aitre u/L'D'Q' aitre
SFX q+ aitre us/D'Q' aitre
SFX q+ aitre ue/L'D'Q' aitre
SFX q+ aitre ues/D'Q' aitre

SFX q. Y 9
SFX q. enir enu/d'q' enir
SFX q. tir ti/d'q' tir
SFX q. courir couru/d'q' courir
SFX q. ivre écu/d'q' vivre
SFX q. aire u/d'q' aire
SFX q. dre du/d'q' dre
SFX q. valoir valu/d'q' .valoir
SFX q. aître u/d'q' aître
SFX q. aitre u/d'q' aitre
