fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
abstenir/i0q+
circonvenir/i0q+
condescendre/tEq.
consentir/i5q+
contenir/i0q+
contrevenir/i0q+
convenir/i0q+
correspondre/tEq.
démentir/i5q+
démordre/tEq.
départir/i5q+
détenir/i0q+
devenir/i0q+
disconvenir/i0q+
entrenuire/yX
entre-nuire/yX
entretenir/i0q+
équivaloir/pNq.
frire/yZ
intervenir/i0q+
maintenir/i0q+
mentir/i5q.
morfondre/tEq+
obtenir/i0q+
obvenir/i0q+
occire/yY
partir/i5q+
parvenir/i0q+
pressentir/i5q+
prévaloir/pNq+
prévenir/i0q+
provenir/i0q+
redevenir/i0q+
repartir/i5q+
repentir/i5q+
ressentir/i5q+
ressortir/i5q+
ressouvenir/i0q+
retenir/i0q+
revenir/i0q+
rire/yW
sentir/i5q+
sortir/i5q+
sourire/yW
soutenir/i0q+
souvenir/i0q+
subvenir/i0q.
survenir/i0q+
tenir/i0q+
venir/i0q+
